California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

5641.1.

This chapter shall not be deemed to prohibit any person from preparing any plans, drawings, or specifications for any property owned by that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.2.

Every person who holds a valid license issued by the State of California under the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6721) of the Food and Agricultural Code, authorizing engagement in the business of selling nursery stock in this state, may engage in the preparation of planting plans or drawings as an adjunct to merchandising nursery stock and related products, but may not use the title of landscape architect. That activity is exempt from licensure under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.3.

An architect, professional engineer, or land surveyor licensed or registered under the statutes of this state, insofar as the licensed or registered professional practices the profession for which they are licensed or registered, is exempt from this chapter, except that an architect, professional engineer, or land surveyor shall not use the title “landscape architect” unless they hold a license as required under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 24.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.4.

A landscape contractor licensed under the statutes of this state, insofar as they work within the classification for which the license is issued, may design systems and facilities for work to be performed and supervised by that landscape contractor and is exempt from this chapter, except that a landscape contractor shall not use the title “landscape architect” unless they hold a license as required under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 25.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.5.

(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to prohibit a person from engaging in the practice of, or offering to practice as, a golf course architect.

(b) As used in this section, “golf course architect” means a person who performs professional services such as consultation, investigation, reconnaissance, research, design, preparation of drawings and specifications and responsible supervision, where the dominant purpose of such service is the design of a golf course, in accordance with accepted professional standards of public health and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

5641.6.

(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to prohibit a person from engaging in the practice of, or offering to practice as, an irrigation consultant.

(b) As used in this section, “irrigation consultant” means a person who performs professional services such as consultation, investigation, reconnaissance, research, design, preparation of drawings and specifications and responsible supervision, where the dominant purpose of such service is the design of landscape irrigation, in accordance with accepted professional standards of public health and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5642.

This chapter shall not be deemed to prevent a landscape architect from forming a partnership, firm, or corporation with, or employing, persons who are not landscape architects if the signature, date, and license number of the landscape architect appears on all instruments of service. In no case shall the other members of the partnership, firm, or corporation be designated or described as landscape architects.

The name of the licensed landscape architect shall appear wherever the firm name is used in the professional practice of the partnership, firm, or corporation, and the landscape architect shall reside in California when the partnership, firm, or corporation maintains a California office or mailing address. The name of the licensee shall appear on all partnership, firm, or corporation stationery, brochures, business cards and any instruments of service used or provided in the professional practice of the partnership, firm, or corporation.

No partnership, firm, or corporation shall engage in the practice of landscape architecture unless the work is under the immediate and responsible direction of a licensee of the board.

Failure of any person to comply with this section constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5644.

Any person who holds a valid state license or other authority that authorizes the person to engage in a business or occupation, insofar as the person engages in a professional, occupational, or business activity within the scope of that license or other authority, shall not be required to be licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance of Certificates [5650. - 5659.]

5650.

Subject to the rules and regulations governing examinations, any person, over the age of 18 years, who has had six years of training and educational experience in actual practice of landscape architectural work shall be entitled to an examination for a license to practice landscape architecture. A degree from a school of landscape architecture approved by the board shall be deemed equivalent to four years of training and educational experience in the actual practice of landscape architecture. Before taking the examination, a person shall file an application therefor with the executive officer and pay the application fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5650.5.

(a) Pursuant to Section 144, the board has the authority to obtain and review criminal offender record information. The information obtained as a result of the fingerprinting shall be used in accordance with Section 11105 of the Penal Code to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial, suspension, or revocation of a license pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Section 5660, 5675, or 5676.

(b) As a condition of application for a license, each applicant shall provide to the Department of Justice a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and to undergo a state- and federal- level criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice, as
 follows:

(1) The Department of Consumer Affairs, California Architects Board shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all landscape architect license applicants pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, as defined by Section 5615, for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests and state or federal convictions and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section, to the Federal Bureau of
 Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the California Architects Board.

(3) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the California Architects Board pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(4) The California Architects Board shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in paragraph (1).

(5) The Department of Justice shall charge the applicant a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this subdivision.

(c) The applicant shall certify, under penalty of perjury, when applying for a license whether the applicant’s fingerprints have been furnished to the Department of Justice in compliance with this section.

(d) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section renders the application for a license incomplete, and the application shall not be considered until the applicant demonstrates compliance with all requirements of this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the results of any criminal offender record information request by either state or federal law enforcement authorities shall not be released by the board except in accordance with state and federal requirements.

(f) As used in this section, the term “applicant” shall be limited to an
 initial applicant who has never been registered or licensed by the board or to an applicant for a new licensure or registration category.

(g) As a condition of petitioning the board for reinstatement of a revoked or surrendered license, an applicant shall comply with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 14.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5651.

(a) The board shall by means of examination, ascertain the professional qualifications of all applicants for licenses to practice landscape architecture in this state and shall issue a license to every person whom it finds to be qualified on payment of the initial license fee prescribed by this chapter.

(b) The examination shall consist of a written examination. The written examination may be waived by the board if the applicant meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Is currently licensed by a United States jurisdiction, Canadian province, or Puerto Rico, has passed a written examination equivalent to that which is required in California at the time of
 application, and has submitted proof of job experience equivalent to that required of California applicants at the time of application.

(2) Has passed the California supplemental examination if, at the time of application, it is required of all California applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 68.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5651.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 111, the board may adopt guidelines for the delegation of its authority to grade the examinations of applicants for licensure to any vendor under contract to the board for provision of a landscape architect’s license examination. The guidelines shall be within the board’s legal authority to establish the standards for licensure in this state, and shall include, but not be limited to: 

(1) Goals for the appropriate content, development, grading, and administration of an examination, against which the vendor’s rules and procedures can be judged. 

(2) Procedures through which the board can reasonably assure itself that the vendor adequately meets the goals established by the board. 

(b) The board shall not delegate its authority to grade the examination of candidates for licensure in this state to any vendor or any party not in compliance with Section 111 or with the guidelines established in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 654, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

5652.

If the applicant’s examination is satisfactory, and upon the payment of the license fee fixed by this chapter, the executive officer shall issue a license to the applicant showing that the person named therein is entitled to practice landscape architecture in this state, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5653.

The board may deny or refuse to issue a license to an applicant upon proof of the commission by the applicant of any act or omission which would constitute grounds for disciplinary action under this chapter if committed by a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5654.

The board shall keep a record of the names and addresses of all licenseholders and such additional personal data as the board may require. A proper index and record of each license issued shall be kept by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5655.

Licenses to practice landscape architecture shall remain in full force until revoked or suspended for cause, or until they expire, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5656.

A duplicate license to practice landscape architecture in place of one which has been lost, destroyed, or mutilated shall be issued upon proper application, subject to the rules and regulations of the board. A duplicate license fee fixed by this chapter shall be charged for the issuance of the duplicate license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5657.

Each licensee shall file their current mailing address with the board at its office in Sacramento, California, and shall notify the board of any and all changes of mailing address, providing both their old and new address within 30 days after a change. A penalty as provided in this chapter shall be paid by a licensee who fails to notify the board within 30 days after a change of address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 26.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5658.

(a) Each applicant for examination or licensure who has a valid email address shall report to the board that email address at the time of application.

(b) Each licensee who has a valid email address shall report to the board or verify that email address at the time of renewal.

(c) Each applicant or licensee shall notify the board within 30 days of any change to their email address on file with the board. 

(d) To protect the privacy of applicants and licensees, the email addresses provided to the board pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not be
 considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(e) Information sent from an email account of the board to a valid email address provided by an applicant or licensee is presumed to have been delivered to the email address provided.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “valid email address” means an email address at which the applicant or licensee is currently receiving email at the time the application or license renewal is submitted to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 27.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5659.

Each person licensed under this chapter shall sign, date, and seal or stamp using a seal or stamp described in this section, all plans, specifications, and other instruments of service therefor, prepared for others as evidence of the person’s responsibility for those documents. Failure to comply with this section constitutes a ground for disciplinary action. Each person licensed under this chapter shall use a seal or stamp of the design authorized by the board, bearing the person’s name, license number, the legend “licensed landscape architect,” the legend “State of California” and a means of providing a signature, the renewal date of the license, and date of signing and sealing or stamping.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 3.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Discipline [5660. - 5678.4.]

5660.

The board may upon its own motion, and shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any landscape architect, and may suspend for a period not exceeding one year, or revoke, the license of any landscape architect who is guilty of any one or more of the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action under the chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5661.

All accusations against a licensee shall be filed within three years after the board discovers, or through the use of reasonable diligence should have discovered, the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action or within six years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, whichever occurs first. However, with respect to an accusation alleging a violation of Section 5667, the accusation may be filed within three years after the discovery by the board of the alleged facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation prohibited by Section 5667.

If any accusation is not filed within the time provided in this section, no action against a licensee shall be commenced under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 229, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5662.

All proceedings for the suspension or revocation of licenses under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The board shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5665.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the license, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this chapter, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the license, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5666.

The fact that the holder of a license is practicing in violation of the provisions of this chapter constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5667.

The fact that the holder of a license has obtained the license by fraud or misrepresentation, or that the person named in the license has obtained it by fraud or misrepresentation constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5668.

The fact that the holder of a license is impersonating a landscape architect or former landscape architect of the same or similar name, or is practicing under an assumed, fictitious or corporate name, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.25.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5669.

The fact that the holder of a license has aided or abetted in the practice of landscape architecture, any person not authorized to practice landscape architecture under the provisions of this chapter, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5670.

The fact that, in the practice of landscape architecture, the holder of a license has been guilty of fraud or deceit constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5671.

The fact that, in the practice of landscape architecture, the holder of a license has been guilty of negligence or willful misconduct constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5672.

The fact that the holder of a license has been guilty of gross incompetence constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5673.

The fact that the holder of a license has affixed his or her signature, or his or her stamp, or has permitted the use of his or her name to or on plans, drawings, specifications or other instruments of service which have not been prepared by him or her or under his or her immediate and responsible direction, or has permitted his or her name or his or her signature or his or her stamp to be used for the purpose of assisting any person, not a landscape architect, to evade the provisions of this chapter, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.

The conviction of a felony in connection with the practice of landscape architecture constitutes a ground for disciplinary action. The record of a conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1535.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.5.

The fact that the holder of a license has had disciplinary action taken by any public agency for any act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties as a landscape architect constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5676.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.32.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5678.

(a) A licensee shall report to the board in writing within 30 days of the date the licensee has knowledge of any civil action judgment, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action resulting in a judgment, settlement, or arbitration award against the licensee in any action alleging fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensee in the practice of landscape architecture if the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be signed by the licensee and shall set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an administrative agency or court, the report shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The title of the matter.

(2) The court or agency name.

(3) The docket number.

(4) The claim or file number.

(5) The date on which the reportable event occurred.

(c) A licensee shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the board concerning the reportable events, including inquiries made by the board in conjunction with license renewal.

(d) Failure of a licensee to comply with this section shall be grounds for disciplinary action.

(e) A licensee who fails to comply with this section may be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) as an intermediate sanction imposed by the board in lieu of revoking the licensee’s license. A licensee who knowingly and intentionally fails to comply with this section may be subject to a civil penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) as an additional intermediate sanction imposed by the board in lieu of revoking the licensee’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5678.1.

(a) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of a civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award described in Section 5678 against a licensee of the board in which the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, any insurer providing professional liability insurance to that licensee or landscape architectural entity shall report to the board all of the following:

(1) The name of the licensee.

(2) The claim or file number.

(3) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.

(4) The amount paid by the insurer.

(5) The identity of the payee.

(b) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award described in Section 5678 against a licensee of the board in which the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, any state or local governmental agency that self insures that licensee shall report to the board all of the following:

(1) The name of the licensee.

(2) The claim or file number.

(3) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.

(4) The amount paid.

(5) The identity of the payee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5678.2.

The requirements of Sections 5678 and 5678.1 shall apply if a party to the civil action, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action is or was (a) a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, or state or local governmental agency in which a licensee is or was an owner, partner, member, officer, or employee and (b) a licensee in responsible control of that portion of the project that was the subject of the civil judgment, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5678.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensee shall not be considered to have violated a confidential settlement agreement or other confidential agreement by providing a report to the board as required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5678.4.

The board may adopt regulations to further define the reporting requirements of Sections 5678 and 5678.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [5680. - 5683.]

5680.

(a) Licenses issued under this chapter shall expire no more than 24 months after the issue date. The expiration date of the original license shall be set by the board in a manner to best distribute renewal procedures throughout each year.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licenseholder shall, on or before the expiration date of the license, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(c) The renewal form shall include a statement specifying whether the licensee was convicted of a crime or disciplined by another public agency during the preceding renewal period and that the licensee’s representations on the renewal form are true, correct, and contain no material omissions of fact, to the best knowledge and belief of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.38.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5680.05.

Within 10 days after a judgment by a court of this state that a licenseholder has committed a crime or is liable for any death, personal or property injury or loss caused by the licenseholder’s fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetency, or recklessness in practice, the clerk of the court which rendered the judgment shall report this to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 22.39.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5680.1.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licenseholder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect
 through the date provided in Section 5680 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 27.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5680.2.

A license that is not renewed within five years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but the holder of the expired license may apply for and obtain a new license if they pay all of the fees and meet all of the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining an original license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 28.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5681.

The fees prescribed by this chapter for landscape architect applicants and landscape architect licensees shall be fixed by the board as follows:

(a) The application fee for reviewing an applicant’s eligibility to take any section of the examination shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) The fee for any section of the examination administered by the board shall not exceed the actual cost to the board for purchasing and administering each exam. The fee for the California Supplemental Examination shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount,
 up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The fee for an original license shall be seven hundred dollars ($700) and the board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of eight hundred dollars ($800), except that, if the license is issued less than one year before the date on which it will expire, then the fee shall equal 50 percent of the fee fixed by the board for an original license. The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the initial license fee where the license is issued less than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.

(d) The fee for a duplicate license shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

(e) The renewal fee shall be seven
 hundred dollars ($700). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of eight hundred dollars ($800).

(f) The penalty for failure to notify the board of a change of address within 30 days from an actual change in address may not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(g) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee for the license in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(h) The fee for filing an application for approval of a school pursuant to Section 5650 may not exceed six hundred dollars ($600) charged and collected on an biennial basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 21.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5682.

Within 10 days after the beginning of every month, all fees collected by the department for the month preceding, under the provisions of this chapter, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the California Architects Board-Landscape Architects Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5683.

The money paid into the California Architects Board-Landscape Architects Fund shall be used for expenditure in the manner prescribed by law to defray the expenses of the board and in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 16.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.9. Interior Designers [5800. - 5812.]

5800.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Certified Interior Designer” means a person who prepares and submits nonstructural or nonseismic plans consistent with Sections 5805 and 5538 to local building departments that are of sufficient complexity so as to require the skills of a licensed contractor to implement them, and who engages in programming, planning, designing, and documenting the construction and installation of nonstructural or nonseismic elements, finishes and furnishings within the interior spaces of a building, and has demonstrated by means of education, experience and examination, the competency to protect and enhance the health, safety, and welfare of the
 public.

(b) An “interior design organization” means the California Council for Interior Design Certification (council), a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code, and consists of Certified Interior Designers whose governing board includes representatives of the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 22.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5801.

A Certified Interior Designer may obtain a stamp from the council that shall include a number that uniquely identifies and bears the name of that Certified Interior Designer and identifies the individual as either a Certified Interior Designer or a Certified Interior Designer with commercial designation if the Certified Interior Designer has met the requirements pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5811.1. The stamp certifies that the Certified Interior Designer has provided the council with evidence of meeting the education, experience, and examination requirements pursuant to Section 5811.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 23.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5801.1.

The procedure for the issuance of a stamp by the council under Section 5801, including the examinations recognized and required by the council, shall be subject to the occupational analyses and examination validation required by Section 139 every five to seven years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 24.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5802.

(a) All drawings, specifications, or documents prepared for submission to any government regulatory agency by any Certified Interior Designer, or under their supervision shall be affixed by a stamp, as specified in Section 5801, and signed by that Certified Interior Designer.

(b) All documents shall be identified as interior design documents, which are not architectural or engineering documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 25.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5803.

A Certified Interior Designer, as defined in this chapter, is exempt from Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 insofar as they are designing systems for work to be performed by a licensed contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 26.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5804.

It is an unfair business practice for any Certified Interior Designer or any other person to advertise or put out any sign or card or other device, including any stamp or seal, or to represent to the public through any print or electronic media, that the person is “state certified” to practice interior design, or to use any other words or symbols that represent to the public that the person is so certified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 27.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5805.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude Certified Interior Designers or any other person from submitting interior design plans for commercial or residential buildings to local building officials, except as provided in Section 5538. In exercising discretion with respect to the acceptance of interior design plans, the local building official shall reference the California Building Standards Code and the occupational title standard set forth in Section 5800.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 28.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5806.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit interior design or interior decorator services by any person or retail activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (SB 308)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5807.
